Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Custody and Detention
§ 43-21-325.
Department of Public Safety authorized to carry out provisions of federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2002; penalties for certain individuals who interfere with department’s performance of its duties.

The Department of Public Safety’s Planning Division is authorized to monitor and carry out the provisions of the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2002 in the four (4) core protection requirements of the act for the state as follows:

Deinstitutionalization of status offenders;

Separation of juveniles from incarcerated adults;

Removal of juveniles from adult jails and lockups; and

Disproportional minority contact.

If any staff or individual of a secure facility prohibits the Department of Public Safety’s Planning Division from fully performing its duties, as prescribed in the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2002, then such staff or individual shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.